Illinois, session 104th, SB1864.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 11 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/11 new)7    Sec. 11. Instructor evaluations. If a student at a public 8institution of higher education is required to complete an 9instructor evaluation, the student shall evaluate the 10instructor's bias on whether the instructor displays any 11prejudiced or unfair treatment toward certain individuals or 12groups based on factors, including, but not limited to, race, 13gender, ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or political 14ideology.